Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201783-968
Method of execution declared unconstitutional; effect on sentence.

No death sentence shall be voided or reduced as a result of a determination that a method of execution was declared unconstitutional under the Constitution of Nebraska or the Constitution of the United States. In any case in which an execution method is declared unconstitutional, the death sentence shall remain in force until the sentence can be lawfully executed by any valid method of execution.

Laws 2009, LB36, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 83-968 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.